Maine, session 132, LD1877.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §3360-I, first ¶, as amended by PL 2023, c. 316, §1 and c. 412,
Pt. GG, §1, is further amended to read:
As part of the sentence or fine imposed, the court shall impose an assessment of $70
on any person convicted of murder, a Class A crime, a Class B crime or a Class C crime
and $40 on any person convicted of a Class D crime or a Class E crime, except that the
court shall impose an assessment of $2,000 $6,000 on any person convicted of aggravated
sex trafficking as described in Title 17‑A, section 852, an assessment of $1,000 $3,000 on
any person convicted of sex trafficking as described in Title 17‑A, section 853, an
assessment of $1,000 on any person for the first conviction and $2,000 for each subsequent
conviction of engaging a person for prostitution as described in Title 17‑A, section 853‑B
and an assessment of $1,000 on any person for the first conviction and $2,000 for each
subsequent conviction of commercial sexual exploitation of a minor or commercial sexual
exploitation of a person with a mental disability as described in Title 17‑A, section 855.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the court may not waive the
imposition of the assessment required by this section. For purposes of collection and
collection procedures, this assessment is considered part of the fine. At the time of
commitment, the court shall inform the Department of Corrections or the county sheriff of
any unpaid balances on assessments owed by the offender to the Victims' Compensation
Fund. All funds collected as a result of these assessments accrue to the Victims'
Compensation Fund.
Page 1 - 132LR1619(04)